Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.071

Revised essential academic learning requirements—Legislative review—Implementation.

(1) By August 2, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction may revise the *state essential academic learning requirements authorized under RCW 28A.655.070 for mathematics, reading, writing, and communication by provisionally adopting a common set of standards for students in grades kindergarten through twelve. The revised *state essential academic learning requirements may be substantially identical with the standards developed by a multistate consortium in which Washington participated, must be consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.655.070, and may include additional standards if the additional standards do not exceed fifteen percent of the standards for each content area. However, the superintendent of public instruction shall not take steps to implement the provisionally adopted standards until the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate have an opportunity to review the standards.

(2) By January 1, 2011, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate:

(a) A detailed comparison of the provisionally adopted standards and the *state essential academic learning requirements as of June 10, 2010, including the comparative level of rigor and specificity of the standards and the implications of any identified differences; and

(b) An estimated timeline and costs to the state and to school districts to implement the provisionally adopted standards, including providing necessary training, realignment of curriculum, adjustment of state assessments, and other actions.

(3) The superintendent may implement the revisions to the *essential academic learning requirements under this section after the 2011 legislative session unless otherwise directed by the legislature.

[ 2010 c 235 s 601.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "essential academic learning requirements" in RCW 28A.655.070 was changed to "state learning standards" by 2019 c 252 s 119.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.